Idaho statutes. Title 58 PUBLIC LANDS
Chapter 5
STATE PARKS AND STATE FORESTS

Sec.

§ 58-501. Acquisition or lease of property for forestry and park purposes authorized.

The state board of land commissioners is hereby authorized to accept gifts, donations or contributions of land suitable for forestry or park purposes and to enter into agreements with the federal government or other agencies for acquiring by lease, purchase or otherwise such lands as in the judgment of the state board of land commissioners are desirable for state forests.

§ 58-502. Expenditures for management and utilization of areas — Sale of products.

When lands are acquired or leased under section 58-501[, Idaho Code], the state board of land commissioners is hereby authorized to make expenditures from any funds not otherwise obligated, for the management, development and utilization of such areas by the director of the department of lands; to sell or otherwise dispose of products from such lands, and to make such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this act.

§ 58-503. Disposition of revenues from lands.

All revenues derived from lands now owned or later acquired under the provision of this act shall be segregated by the state treasurer for the use of the state board of land commissioners in the acquisition, management, development and use of such lands until all obligations incurred have been paid in full. Thereafter, fifty per cent (50%) of all net profits accruing from the administration of such lands shall be applicable for such purposes as the legislature may prescribe, and fifty per cent (50%) shall be paid into the school fund of the county in which lands are located. Provided, however, that revenues generated from such lands that are subsequently transferred to the department of parks and recreation shall remain with the department of parks and recreation.

§ 58-504. Payment of obligations.

Obligations for the acquisition of land incurred by the state board of land commissioners under the authority of this act shall be paid solely and exclusively from revenues derived from such lands and shall not impose any liability upon the general credit and taxing power of the state.

§ 58-505. Authority to sell, lease, transfer or exchange lands or products.

The state board of land commissioners shall have full power and authority to sell, exchange or lease lands under its jurisdiction and/or exchange products of lands obtained under the provisions of this act for other forest or park lands when in its judgment it is advantageous to the state to do so in the highest orderly development and management of state forests and state parks: provided, however, said sale, lease or exchange shall not be contrary to the terms of any contract which it has entered into. The board shall have full power and authority to transfer to the department of parks and recreation lands acquired under the provisions of this chapter that are suitable for park or other purposes provided for in sections 67-4240 through 67-4244, Idaho Code.

§ 58-506. Separability.

Should any part of this act be declared unconstitutional or invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, it shall not affect the validity of the remainder of the act, but the act shall be construed as though that part were not incorporated therein.

§ 58-507. Legislative findings and purposes.

The legislature of the state of Idaho finds:

That the following described tracts of endowment land, containing fifty-seven and two-tenths (57.2) acres of endowment land, more or less, managed by the state board of land commissioners, are located near, adjacent to, or within the boundaries of Ponderosa State Park near McCall, Idaho:

Part Government Lot 1, Part Government Lot 2, Section 4, T18N, R3E, B.M., containing forty-eight (48) acres, more or less, and commonly referred to as Lakeview Village;

One (1) parcel of vacant land in Government Lots 1 and 2, Section 4, T18N, R3E, B.M., containing six (6) acres, more or less;

Part Government Lot 7, Section 34, T19N, R3E, B.M., containing two and eight-tenths (2.8) acres, more or less, commonly referred to as the Nazarene Church Camp;

One (1) cottage site lease lot in Government Lot 7, Section 34, T19N, R3E, B.M., containing four-tenths (.4) acres, more or less, currently leased to Marie Whitesel.

That the Idaho park and recreation board manages Ponderosa State Park for public recreation and desires to consolidate ownership and management of the described parcels of endowment land with the existing park;

That endowment lands are held in trust by the state board of land commissioners and are managed to generate the maximum long-term financial returns to the institution to which granted, or to the state if not specifically granted;

That any transaction in which the Idaho park and recreation board acquires title to endowment lands, for inclusion in Ponderosa State Park, the state board of land commissioners shall receive title to real property of equivalent market value through land exchange;

The Idaho park and recreation board and the state board of land commissioners have agreed to enter into a contract by which the Idaho park and recreation board may acquire the described endowment lands, associated timber, and improvements now owned by the state board of land commissioners, through land exchange at not less than fair market value, as determined by qualified appraisals;

The Idaho park and recreation board has agreed to acquire title to the described endowment lands subject to any outstanding rights and reservations of record, and shall pay all costs of the transactions including, but not limited to, surveys and appraisals;

It is the intent of the legislature to provide funds for this exchange to the Idaho park and recreation board in a timely manner.